North Carolina, session 2025, SB849.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 75 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 9.
"Entertainment Event Ticket Sales and Resales."
SECTION 1.(b) The following provisions are to be located in Article 9 of Chapter
75 of the General Statutes, as established by subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Subsection (a) of G.S. 75-44 is recodified as G.S. 75-151, to be titled
"Definitions."
(2) Subsection (b) of G.S. 75-44 is recodified as G.S. 75-152, to be titled "Ticket
price transparency."
(3) Subsection (c) of G.S. 75-44 is recodified as G.S. 75-157, to be titled
"Enforcement."
SECTION 2. Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, as established by
Section 1 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"Article 9.
"Entertainment Event Ticket Sales and Resales.
"§ 75-151. Definitions.
As used in this section Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) Bot. – Any machine, device, computer program, or computer software used to
purchase tickets that, on its own or with human assistance, bypasses security
measures or access control systems on a retail ticket purchasing platform or
other controls or measures on a retail ticket purchasing platform that assist in
implementing a limit on the number of tickets that can be purchased for an
entertainment event.
(2) Clearly and conspicuously disclose. – To present information in a manner that
is difficult to miss and easily understandable, including by meeting the
following standards:
a. In the case of a visual disclosure, its size, contrast, location, the length
of time it appears, and other characteristics stand out from and are
equal to or greater in size than any accompanying text or other visual
elements so that it is easily noticed, read, and understood.
b. It is unavoidable.
*S849-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. It uses diction and syntax understandable to ordinary consumers and
appears in each language in which the representation that requires the
disclosure appears.
d. It is not contradicted, mitigated by, or inconsistent with any other
communication made to a consumer.
(3) Entertainer. – An individual, group, or team that performs at an entertainment
event.
(1)(4) Entertainment event. – A sporting game or contest, concert, or other
entertainment performance with a live presentation element in this State for
which attendance is available to the public through the purchase of a ticket.
(5) Fan club. – A membership-based program, established by an entertainer,
venue, or event organizer, or an agent or affiliate of such, that offers members
the opportunity to purchase tickets for an entertainment event prior to the
tickets being offered for sale to the general public.
(2)(6) Mandatory fee. – Any fee or surcharge that a consumer must pay in order to
purchase a ticket to an entertainment event.
(3)(7) Resale. – The second or subsequent sale of a ticket through a website or other
electronic means.by any method, including in-person transactions, telephone,
mail, email, facsimile, or electronic means through websites or mobile
applications.
(4)(8) Reseller. – A person engaged in the resale of tickets. This term includes agents
and affiliates of a reseller.
(5)(9) Secondary ticket exchange. – An electronic marketplace that enables persons
to sell, purchase, and resell tickets. This term includes agents and affiliates of
a secondary ticket exchange.
(10) Speculative ticket. – A ticket not in the actual or constructive possession of a
reseller at the time of listing, sale, or advertisement, including tickets not
owned by the reseller or under contract to be transferred to the reseller at the
time of sale.
(6)(11) Ticket issuer. – The person that is the first seller of tickets for an entertainment
event, including a musician or musical group, an operator of a venue, sponsor
or a promoter of an entertainment event, a sports team participating in an
entertainment event, a sports league whose teams are participating in an
entertainment event, a theater company, a marketplace or service operated for
consumers to make an initial purchase of tickets, or an agent of any of the
persons listed in this subdivision.
(7)(12) Ticketing link website. – A website that purports to sell entertainment event
tickets when no transactions occur on the website but instead links or redirects
to a reseller or secondary ticket exchange website.
(13) Ticketing session. – The period of time beginning when the price of a ticket
to an entertainment event is first displayed to a person through a website or
application and ending when the person has not purchased the ticket within
the time period prescribed by the secondary ticket exchange, ticket issuer, or
reseller.
"§ 75-152. Ticket price transparency.
A secondary ticket exchange, ticket issuer, or reseller shall meet the following requirements
when listing a ticket for sale or resale:
(1) At any time the price of the ticket is displayed to the purchaser, the listing
shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the total price of the ticket, including
all mandatory fees and the maximum order processing fee, if any.
Page 2 Senate Bill 849-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The total price of the ticket initially displayed at the beginning of a ticketing
session shall not be increased during that ticketing session, except by the
addition of the charges permitted under subdivision (4) of this
subsection.section.
(3) The listing shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer the
existence and actual dollar amount of each mandatory fee, if any, prior to the
completion of the transaction. The descriptor used to identify each mandatory
fee shall not be deceptive or misleading.
(4) The following charges are not mandatory fees and may be added to the ticket
price and shall be disclosed to the purchaser prior to purchase of the ticket:
a. Actual charges required to deliver a non-electronic ticket to the
address specified by the purchaser by the delivery method designated
by the purchaser.
b. Taxes or fees imposed on the transaction by any government.
c. A reasonable fee for processing the order.
(5) The listing shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer the
location of the seat corresponding to the ticket, including the row and section
number, or if there is no assigned seat, the general admission area.
(6) The issuer, reseller, or secondary ticket exchange shall clearly and
conspicuously disclose in the listing and at the point-of-sale whether this is an
initial sale or resale of a ticket, including the following:
a. If a ticket is being resold through a secondary ticketing exchange that
is not the ticket issuer, the secondary ticketing exchange shall clearly
and conspicuously disclose that it is not the ticket issuer and provide
an active link and the website address of where a consumer may
purchase a ticket from the ticket issuer.
b. If the secondary ticket exchange is also the ticket issuer, the secondary
ticket exchange shall clearly and conspicuously disclose on each page
or interface when a consumer is participating in the resale process.
"§ 75-153. Prohibition of speculative ticket sales.
In addition to any other restrictions imposed by a ticket issuer, a reseller or secondary ticket
exchange shall not (i) sell or offer to sell speculative tickets or (ii) resell more than one copy of
the same ticket to an entertainment event.
"§ 75-154. Access to presale and fan club tickets.
(a) A ticket issuer, reseller, or secondary ticket exchange shall not resell a ticket before
it has been made available to the public through the ticket's initial sale, unless it is authorized by
an entertainer, venue, or event organizer.
(b) A ticket reseller or secondary ticket exchange shall not purchase, sell, or resell a ticket
through a fan club ticket presale or fan club program unless authorized by the fan club.
"§ 75-155. Ticketing website use of branding and intellectual property.
In any advertisements, promotional materials, or online content, including websites, website
addresses, and social media, a reseller, secondary ticketing exchange, and operator of a ticketing
link website shall not do any of the following:
(1) Use the name, graphic, logo, image, trademark, trade dress, or any other
intellectual property of an entertainer, venue, or event organizer without prior
authorization.
(2) Resemble the branding of or otherwise visually imply a connection to an
entertainer, venue, or event organizer, even if there has not been a violation of
an intellectual property right, if the resemblance was intentionally designed to
create the false appearance of an agent, affiliate, or other relationship with an
entertainer, venue, or event organizer, when no such relationship exists.
Senate Bill 849-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) State or imply an affiliation with or endorsement by an entertainer, venue, or
event organizer, including by using words like "official," when no such
relationship or endorsement exists.
"§ 75-156. Prohibition on circumvention of internet ticket sales limitations.
A person shall not use or create a bot to perform any of the following actions:
(1) Purchase tickets for any single internet ticket sale.
(2) Use multiple Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, purchaser accounts, or email
addresses to purchase tickets for any single internet ticket sale in excess of the
purchase limit imposed by the ticket issuer or eight tickets, whichever is less.
(3) Circumvent or disable an electronic queue, waiting period, presale code, or
other sales volume limitation system associated with an internet ticket sale.
(4) Circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system, or any other
control or measure used to facilitate authorized entry to an event.
"§ 75-157. Enforcement.
(a) A violation of this section Article is an unfair trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1 and is
subject to all of the investigative, enforcement, and penalty provisions of an unfair trade practice
under this Article.Chapter.
(b) In addition to any other relief or penalty allowed under this Chapter or other State
law, a court may issue a civil penalty of up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day that a
violation of this Article has occurred and the greater of (i) one thousand dollars ($1,000) or (ii)
five times the total ticket price, per ticket listed, advertised, sold, or resold in violation of this
Article.
(c) If a court finds that a violation of this Article was willful, the court may impose an
additional civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per ticket sold or resold in violation of
this Article.
(d) The Attorney General shall ensure consumers are able to report violations of this
Article on the Department of Justice's website and by telephone.
(e) No later than August 1 of each year, the Attorney General shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the number and types of
enforcement actions taken pursuant to this Article. A copy of the report shall also be made
publicly available on the Department of Justice's website."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in recurring funds beginning in
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the Office of the Attorney General to create one or
more full-time equivalent (FTE) positions to support enforcement of the entertainment event
ticket sale requirements of Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, as enacted by this act.
SECTION 4. Section 1 and Section 2 of this act become effective October 1, 2026,
and apply to tickets sold on or after that date. The remainder of this act becomes effective July
1, 2026.
Page 4 Senate Bill 849-First Edition